Illinois, session 104th, SB1420.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Public Health Powers and 5Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 6amended by adding Section 2310-735 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2310/2310-735 new)8    Sec. 2310-735. Rocky Mountain Spotted Fever; public 9announcements. The Department of Public Health shall adopt 10rules requiring a local health department to make public 11announcements for the purpose of informing the general public 12when a positive case of Rocky Mountain Spotted Fever is 13detected within a county or area under the local health 14department's jurisdiction.